Tennessee, session 114, HB1055.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-152(c), is amended by deleting
the language "seventy miles per hour (70 mph)" and substituting instead the language "seventy-
five miles per hour (75 mph)" and by deleting the language "fifty-five miles per hour (55 mph)"
and substituting instead the language "sixty miles per hour (60 mph)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-8-152(f)(2), is amended by
deleting the language "in excess of fifty-five miles per hour (55 mph) but less than seventy-five
miles per hour (75 mph)" and substituting instead the language "in excess of sixty miles per
hour (60 mph) but less than eighty miles per hour (80 mph)" and by deleting the language "This
subsection (f) shall not apply to trucks as defined in subsection (b) when traveling in excess of
sixty-five miles per hour (65 mph) on all highways of the interstate and defense highway system
and four-laned controlled-access highways," and substituting instead the language "This
subsection (f) does not apply to trucks as defined in subsection (b) when traveling in excess of
seventy miles per hour (70 mph) on all highways of the interstate and defense highway system
and four-laned controlled-access highways,".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1055
001347
- 1 -